Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1284.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Criminal penalty. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c), a person who violates subdivision 1 is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition to any other penalty imposed, must be fined not less than $300, or not less than $550 if the violation is within ten years of a prior violation. new text end new text begin (b) A person who violates subdivision 1 within ten years of two or more prior violations is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and, in addition to any other penalty imposed, must be fined not less than $850. new text end new text begin (c) This subdivision does not apply to a person whose driver's license is expired for less than three months from the date of violation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to violations occurring on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.20, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Criminal penalty. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), a person who violates subdivision 2 is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition to any other penalty imposed, must be fined not less than $300, or not less than $550 if the violation is within ten years of a prior violation. new text end new text begin (b) A person who violates subdivision 2 within ten years of two or more prior violations is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and, in addition to any other penalty imposed, must be fined not less than $850. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to violations occurring on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.24, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Driving after revocation; misdemeanor. new text begin Except as otherwise provided in subdivision 5, new text end a person is guilty of a misdemeanor if: (1) the person's driver's license or driving privilege has been revoked; (2) the person has been given notice of or reasonably should know of the revocation; and (3) the person disobeys the order by operating in this state any motor vehicle, the operation of which requires a driver's license, while the person's license or privilege is revoked. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to violations occurring on or after that date. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.24, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Driving after cancellation; misdemeanor. new text begin Except as otherwise provided in subdivision 5, new text end a person is guilty of a misdemeanor if: (1) the person's driver's license or driving privilege has been canceled; (2) the person has been given notice of or reasonably should know of the cancellation; and (3) the person disobeys the order by operating in this state any motor vehicle, the operation of which requires a driver's license, while the person's license or privilege is canceled. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to violations occurring on or after that date. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.24, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Driving after disqualification; misdemeanor. new text begin Except as otherwise provided in subdivision 5, new text end a person is guilty of a misdemeanor if the person: (1) has been disqualified from holding a commercial driver's license or been denied the privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle; (2) has been given notice of or reasonably should know of the disqualification; and (3) disobeys the order by operating in this state a commercial motor vehicle while the person is disqualified to hold the license or privilege. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to violations occurring on or after that date. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.24, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Gross misdemeanor. new text begin (a) new text end A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if: (1) the person's driver's license or driving privilege has been canceled or denied under section 171.04, subdivision 1, clause (10); (2) the person has been given notice of or reasonably should know of the cancellation or denial; and (3) the person disobeys the order by operating in this state any motor vehicle, the operation of which requires a driver's license, while the person's license or privilege is canceled or denied. new text begin (b) A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if the person violates subdivision 1, 2, 3, or 4 and the violation occurs within ten years of two or more prior violations of subdivision 1, 2, 3, or 4. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to violations occurring on or after that date. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.24, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Mandatory fines. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), a person who violates subdivision 1, 2, 3, or 4, in addition to any other penalty imposed, must be fined not less than $300, or not less than $550 if the violation is within ten years of a prior violation of subdivision 1, 2, 3, or 4. new text end new text begin (b) A person who commits a gross misdemeanor level violation of subdivision 1, 2, 3, or 4, in addition to any other penalty imposed, must be fined not less than $850. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to violations occurring on or after that date. new text end